Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-109
Offenses occurring during preceding term.

An impeachment against any state officer shall be tried and judgment of removal from office, or disqualification to hold office, may be rendered, notwithstanding the offense for which said officer is tried occurred during a term of office immediately preceding.

Laws 1879, § 9, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 1136;

C.S.1922, § 1065;

C.S.1929, § 27-109;

R.S.1943, § 24-109.

Nebraska's impeachment statutes specifically provide that a state officer may be impeached notwithstanding the offense for which said officer is tried occurred during a term of office immediately preceding. Nebraska Legislature on behalf of State v. Hergert, 271 Neb. 976, 720 N.W.2d 372 (2006).